sq_AL/sq_AL.aff
# Copyright 2002, 2009 Luan Kelmendi
#
# E-Mail: l.k@apolonix.com
#
# Version 1.2 (20.08.2009) 
#
# This file is distributed under GPL license
#
# This file is part of the Albanian dictionary.
#
# The Albanian dictionary is free software; you can redistribute it and/or
# modify it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published
# by the Free Software Foundation; either version 2 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.
#
# The Albanian dictionary is distributed in the hope that it will be
# useful, but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.
# GPL license can be found here:
# http://www.fsf.org/licenses/licenses.html

SET ISO8859-1

TRY eiaërstohukmçpdvgbfycEIAËRSTOHUKMÇPDVGBFYC

SFX T Y 9
SFX T   0    ve           [aeëiouy]
SFX T   0    të           [aeëiouy]
SFX T   0    së           [aeëiouy]
SFX T   0    sh           [aeëiouy]
SFX T   0    në           [aeëiouy]
SFX T   0    je           [aeëouy]
SFX T   0    ja           [aeëouy]
SFX T   0    e            i
SFX T   0    a            i

SFX S Y 9
SFX S   e    ja           [^ij]e
SFX S   e    a            [ij]e
SFX S   0    ve           [eo]
SFX S   0    t            [eo]
SFX S   0    sh           [eo]
SFX S   0    s            [eo]
SFX S   0    n            [eo]
SFX S   0    je           [eo]
SFX S   0    ja           o

SFX R Y 7
SFX R   ë    e            ë
SFX R   ë    a            ë
SFX R   0    ve           ë
SFX R   0    t            ë
SFX R   0    sh           ë
SFX R   0    s            ë
SFX R   0    n            ë

SFX Q Y 28
SFX Q   ërr  rrës         ërr
SFX Q   ërr  rrën         ërr
SFX Q   ërr  rre          ërr
SFX Q   ërr  rrave        ërr
SFX Q   ërr  rrat         ërr
SFX Q   ërr  rrash        ërr
SFX Q   ërr  rra          ërr
SFX Q   ër   rës          ër
SFX Q   ër   rën          ër
SFX Q   ër   re           ër
SFX Q   ër   rave         ër
SFX Q   ër   rat          ër
SFX Q   ër   rash         ër
SFX Q   ër   ra           ër
SFX Q   ël   lës          ël
SFX Q   ël   lën          ël
SFX Q   ël   le           ël
SFX Q   ël   lave         ël
SFX Q   ël   lat          ël
SFX Q   ël   lash         ël
SFX Q   ël   la           ël
SFX Q   ë    ës           ë
SFX Q   ë    ën           ë
SFX Q   ë    e            ë
SFX Q   ë    ave          ë
SFX Q   ë    at           ë
SFX Q   ë    ash          ë
SFX Q   ë    a            ë

SFX P Y 3
SFX P   0    ut           .
SFX P   0    un           .
SFX P   0    u            .

SFX N Y 4
SFX N   0    eve          [^aeëiouy]
SFX N   0    et           [^aeëiouy]
SFX N   0    esh          [^aeëiouy]
SFX N   0    e            [^aeëiouy]

SFX M Y 4
SFX M   0    ëve          [^aeëiouy]
SFX M   0    ët           [^aeëiouy]
SFX M   0    ësh          [^aeëiouy]
SFX M   0    ë            [^aeëiouy]

SFX L Y 4
SFX L   0    ave          [^aeëiouy]
SFX L   0    at           [^aeëiouy]
SFX L   0    ash          [^aeëiouy]
SFX L   0    a            [^aeëiouy]

SFX K Y 3
SFX K   0    it           .
SFX K   0    in           .
SFX K   0    i            .

SFX H Y 12
SFX H   0    të           [^aeëiouy]
SFX H   0    shin         [^aeëiouy]
SFX H   0    shim         [^aeëiouy]
SFX H   0    shi          [^aeëiouy]
SFX H   0    sha          [^aeëiouy]
SFX H   0    sh           [^aeëiouy]
SFX H   0    keni         [^aeëiouy]
SFX H   0    kemi         [^aeëiouy]
SFX H   0    ke           [^aeëiouy]
SFX H   0    kan          [^aeëiouy]
SFX H   0    kam          [^aeëiouy]
SFX H   0    ka           [^aeëiouy]

SFX G Y 17
SFX G   t    ste          t
SFX G   0    ësh          [^aeëiouy]
SFX G   0    ë            [^aeëiouy]
SFX G   0    ur           [^aeëiouy]
SFX G   0    te           t
SFX G   0    te           [^aeëiotuy]
SFX G   0    nit          [^aeëiouy]
SFX G   0    nin          [^aeëiouy]
SFX G   0    nim          [^aeëiouy]
SFX G   0    ni           [^aeëiouy]
SFX G   0    je           [^aeëiouy]
SFX G   0    ja           [^aeëiouy]
SFX G   0    in           [^aeëiouy]
SFX G   0    im           [^aeëiouy]
SFX G   0    i            [^aeëiouy]
SFX G   0    e            [^aeëiouy]
SFX G   0    a            [^aeëiouy]

SFX F Y 13
SFX F   j    huni         [aeëiouy]j
SFX F   j    het          [aeëiouy]j
SFX F   j    heshit       [aeëiouy]j
SFX F   j    heshin       [aeëiouy]j
SFX F   j    heshim       [aeëiouy]j
SFX F   j    heshe        [aeëiouy]j
SFX F   j    hesha        [aeëiouy]j
SFX F   j    hesh         [aeëiouy]j
SFX F   j    heni         [aeëiouy]j
SFX F   j    hen          [aeëiouy]j
SFX F   j    hemi         [aeëiouy]j
SFX F   j    hem          [aeëiouy]j
SFX F   j    hej          [aeëiouy]j

SFX D Y 24
SFX D   uaj  oftë         uaj
SFX D   uaj  ofshin       uaj
SFX D   uaj  ofshim       uaj
SFX D   uaj  ofshi        uaj
SFX D   uaj  ofsha        uaj
SFX D   uaj  ofsh         uaj
SFX D   oj   uakeni       oj
SFX D   oj   uakemi       oj
SFX D   oj   uake         oj
SFX D   oj   uakan        oj
SFX D   oj   uakam        oj
SFX D   oj   uaka         oj
SFX D   j    keni         [aeëiuy]j
SFX D   j    kemi         [aeëiuy]j
SFX D   j    ke           [aeëiuy]j
SFX D   j    kan          [aeëiuy]j
SFX D   j    kam          [aeëiuy]j
SFX D   j    ka           [aeëiuy]j
SFX D   j    ftë          [^u][aeëiouy]j
SFX D   j    fshin        [^u][aeëiouy]j
SFX D   j    fshim        [^u][aeëiouy]j
SFX D   j    fshi         [^u][aeëiouy]j
SFX D   j    fsha         [^u][aeëiouy]j
SFX D   j    fsh          [^u][aeëiouy]j

SFX C Y 28
SFX C   yej  yet          yej
SFX C   yej  yer          yej
SFX C   yej  yen          yej
SFX C   yej  yem          yej
SFX C   yej  eve          yej
SFX C   yej  eva          yej
SFX C   yej  eu           yej
SFX C   uaj  uat          uaj
SFX C   uaj  uar          uaj
SFX C   uaj  uan          uaj
SFX C   uaj  uam          uaj
SFX C   uaj  ove          uaj
SFX C   uaj  ova          uaj
SFX C   uaj  oi           uaj
SFX C   oj   uat          oj
SFX C   oj   uar          oj
SFX C   oj   uan          oj
SFX C   oj   uam          oj
SFX C   j    ve           [^iuy][aeëiouy]j
SFX C   j    va           [^iuy][aeëiouy]j
SFX C   j    i            oj
SFX C   iej  jeve         iej
SFX C   iej  jeva         iej
SFX C   iej  jeu          iej
SFX C   iej  iet          iej
SFX C   iej  ier          iej
SFX C   iej  ien          iej
SFX C   iej  iem          iej

SFX B Y 12
SFX B   j    sh           [aeëiouy]j
SFX B   j    nte          [aeëiouy]j
SFX B   j    nit          [aeëiouy]j
SFX B   j    nin          [aeëiouy]j
SFX B   j    nim          [aeëiouy]j
SFX B   j    ni           [aeëiouy]j
SFX B   j    n            [aeëiouy]j
SFX B   j    jë           [aeëiouy]j
SFX B   j    jnë          [aeëiouy]j
SFX B   j    jmë          [aeëiouy]j
SFX B   j    je           [aeëiouy]j
SFX B   j    ja           [aeëiouy]j

PFX Z Y 1
PFX Z   0    ç'           .

PFX X Y 1
PFX X   0    s'           .

PFX E Y 1
PFX E   0    për          .

PFX A Y 1
PFX A   0    pa           .

REP 52
REP a ë
REP ë a
REP ë e
REP e ë
REP u y
REP y u
REP i y
REP y i
REP u ua
REP u ue
REP y ye
REP c ç
REP ç c
REP ç q
REP q ç
REP i j
REP j i
REP i ij
REP ij i
REP d t
REP t d
REP g gj
REP j nj
REP gj xh
REP xh gj
REP s z
REP z s
REP sh ç
REP ç sh
REP z zh
REP zh z
REP ç sh
REP sh ç
REP ç zh
REP zh ç
REP d dt
REP l ll
REP ll l
REP r rr
REP rr r
REP eshte është
REP asht është
REP kan kanë
REP jan janë
REP kete këtë
REP ket këtë
REP kte këtë
REP ktë këtë
REP kt këtë
REP keti këtij
REP kti këtij
REP kto këto
